Hawaii statutes.
§383-96 Service. Whenever it is
provided herein that any service shall be made upon the department of labor and
industrial relations, such service may be made upon the director of labor and
industrial relations or upon such representative as the director may have
designated for that purpose. [L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 32; RL 1945, §4275;
RL 1955, §93-95; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-96]

Rules of Court

Service, see HRCP rule 4(d)(5).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next